DictionaryAnalyser/toy_example/apertium-es-ca/apertium-es-ca.es.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 3
	Entries: 43921
	Sdefs: 66
	Paradigms: 431
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools equiv-paradigms -standard apertium-es-ca/apertium-es-ca.es.dix apertium-es-ca/apertium-es-ca.es.clean.dix

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzŀl</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr" /> 
    <sdef n="v2" /> 
    <sdef n="predet" /> 
    <sdef n="detnt" /> 
    <sdef n="loc" /> 
    <sdef n="ant" /> 
    <sdef n="al" /> 
    <sdef n="enc" /> 
    <sdef n="pro" /> 
    <sdef n="tn" /> 
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="np" /> 
    <sdef n="adj" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="m" /> 
    <sdef n="mf" /> 
    <sdef n="sg" /> 
    <sdef n="pl" /> 
    <sdef n="adv" /> 
    <sdef n="preadv" /> 
    <sdef n="pr" /> 
    <sdef n="prn" /> 
    <sdef n="rel" /> 
    <sdef n="nn" /> 
    <sdef n="an" /> 
    <sdef n="aa" /> 
    <sdef n="ind" /> 
    <sdef n="itg" /> 
    <sdef n="det" /> 
    <sdef n="dem" /> 
    <sdef n="def" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
    <sdef n="nt" /> 
    <sdef n="vbser" /> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
    <sdef n="vblex" /> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" /> 
    <sdef n="inf" /> 
    <sdef n="ger" /> 
    <sdef n="pp" /> 
    <sdef n="pri" /> 
    <sdef n="p1" /> 
    <sdef n="p2" /> 
    <sdef n="p3" /> 
    <sdef n="pii" /> 
    <sdef n="ifi" /> 
    <sdef n="fti" /> 
    <sdef n="cni" /> 
    <sdef n="prs" /> 
    <sdef n="pis" /> 
    <sdef n="fts" /> 
    <sdef n="imp" /> 
    <sdef n="pos" /> 
    <sdef n="sp" /> 
    <sdef n="ref" /> 
    <sdef n="sup" /> 
    <sdef n="num" /> 
    <sdef n="ij" /> 
    <sdef n="sent" /> 
    <sdef n="cm" /> 
    <sdef n="lpar" /> 
    <sdef n="rpar" /> 
    <sdef n="lquest" /> 
    <sdef n="web" /> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
	<pardef n="lo__detnt">
	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l></l>
		<r><s n="detnt"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="tod/o__predet">
	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l>as</l>
		<r>o<s n="predet"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>


	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l>a</l>
		<r>o<s n="predet"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>


	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l>os</l>
		<r>o<s n="predet"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>


	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l>o</l>
		<r>o<s n="predet"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>


	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l>o</l>
		<r>o<s n="predet"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="abogad/o__n">
	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l>as</l>
		<r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>


	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l>a</l>
		<r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>


	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l>os</l>
		<r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>


	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l>o</l>
		<r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="BBC__n">
	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l></l>
		<r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="señor__n">
	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l>as</l>
		<r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>


	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l>a</l>
		<r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>


	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l>es</l>
		<r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>


	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l></l>
		<r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="accionista__n">
	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l>s</l>
		<r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>


	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l></l>
		<r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="Ferrari__np">
	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l></l>
		<r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>

	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l></l>
		<r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="Afganistán__np">
	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l></l>
		<r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="Belén__np">
	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l></l>
		<r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>


	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l></l>
		<r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="absolut/o__adj" c="com abstract/o però sense formes superlatives">
	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l>as</l>
		<r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>


	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l>a</l>
		<r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>


	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l>os</l>
		<r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>


	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l>o</l>
		<r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>


	    </pardef>

	<pardef n="una_serie_de__det">
	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l></l>
		<r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="clarisa__adj">
	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l>s</l>
		<r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>


	    <e>
	      <p>
		<l></l>
		<r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	      </p>
	    </e>
	</pardef>
  </pardefs>

  <section id="main" type="standard">
	<e lm="lo"><i>lo</i><par n="lo__detnt"/></e>

	<e lm="todo"><i>tod</i><par n="tod/o__predet"/></e>

	<e lm="siervo" a="prompsit2adn"><i>sierv</i><par n="abogad/o__n"/></e>

	<e lm="BBC"><i>BBC</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
	<e lm="UVic"><i>UVic</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>

	<e lm="orador"><i>orador</i><par n="señor__n"/></e>
	<e lm="acusador"><i>acusador</i><par n="señor__n"/></e>
	<e lm="administrador"><i>administrador</i><par n="señor__n"/></e>

	<e lm="prestamista" a="prompsit2adn"><i>prestamista</i><par n="accionista__n"/></e>

	<e lm="Ferrari"><i>Ferrari</i><par n="Ferrari__np"/></e>

	<e lm="Amara"><i>Amara</i><par n="Afganistán__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Antiguo" i="yes"><i>Antiguo</i><par n="Afganistán__np"/></e>

	<e lm="Núria"><i>Núria</i><par n="Belén__np"/></e>
	<e lm="Pau"><i>Pau</i><par n="Belén__np"/></e>


	<e lm="toda una serie de"><i>toda<b/>una<b/>serie<b/>de</i><par n="una_serie_de__det"/></e>
	<e r="RL" lm="una serie de" a="prompsit2uoc"><i>una<b/>serie<b/>de</i><par n="una_serie_de__det"/></e>


	<e lm="lesbiana"><i>lesbiana</i><par n="clarisa__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="clarisa"><i>clarisa</i><par n="clarisa__adj"/></e>


	<e lm="casto"><i>cast</i><par n="absolut/o__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="bajo"><i>baj</i><par n="absolut/o__adj"/></e>
  </section>
</dictionary>
